Hawaii statutes.
[§431:19-212] Suspension and revocation of
certificate of authority. (a) The commissioner shall notify a special
purpose financial captive insurance company not less than thirty days before
suspending or revoking its certificate of authority pursuant to section
431:19-109, which notice shall state the basis for the suspension or
revocation. The special purpose financial captive insurance company shall be
afforded the opportunity for a hearing pursuant to chapter 91.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) and section
91-9.5, the commissioner may cause the immediate suspension or restriction of
the special purpose financial captive insurance company's certificate of
authority, subject to timely subsequent notice and opportunity for a hearing,
upon the commissioner's determination that the failure to take an action may
result in the material deterioration of the financial condition or soundness of
the special purpose financial captive insurance company, and that for the
protection of the public from the possible consequences of practices, the
special purpose financial captive insurance company's certificate of authority
should be immediately suspended or restricted.

The commissioner may order the summary
suspension of the certificate of authority for a period not to exceed the later
of thirty days or, if a hearing is requested by the special purpose financial
captive insurance company pursuant to chapter 91, the conclusion of the
hearing. Any attempt by the special purpose financial captive insurance company
to continue its operations while its certificate of authority has been
summarily suspended shall be sufficient to warrant a permanent revocation of
the certificate of authority and shall subject the special purpose financial
captive insurance company to all penalties prescribed by this article, or any
rule or order issued by the commissioner.

(c) For purposes of this section, any
reference to section 431:19-104 in section 431:19-109(a)(2) shall be construed
to also reference section 431:19-207. [L 2008, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next